Utah statutes.
41-6a-518.1.   Tampering with an ignition interlock system.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "ignition interlock system" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-6a-518; and

(b)  "interlock restricted driver" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-6a-518.2.

(2) (a)  A person may not:

(i)  circumvent or tamper with the operation of an ignition interlock system;

(ii)  knowingly furnish an interlock restricted driver a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock system unless authorized under Subsection 41-6a-518(7);

(iii)  blow into an ignition interlock system or start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock system for the purpose of allowing an interlock restricted driver to operate a motor vehicle; or

(iv)  advertise for sale, offer for sale, sell, or lease an ignition interlock system unless the system has been certified by the commissioner as required under Subsection 41-6a-518(8).

(b)  An interlock restricted driver may not:

(i)  rent, lease, or borrow a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock system; or

(ii)  request another person to blow into an ignition interlock system in order to allow the interlock restricted driver to operate the motor vehicle.

(c)  A violation of any provision under this Subsection (2) is a class B misdemeanor.

(3)  It is an affirmative defense to a charge of a violation of this section if:

(a)  the starting of a motor vehicle, or the request to start a motor vehicle, that is equipped with an ignition interlock system is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the system or the motor vehicle; and

(b)  the interlock restricted driver does not operate the motor vehicle.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2006 General Session

